Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2214.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin SPECIAL LICENSE; CITY OF SPRINGFIELD.new text end new text begin The city of Springfield may issue an on-sale intoxicating liquor license, an on-sale wine and strong beer license, or an on-sale including Sunday intoxicating liquor license for the city-owned facility known as the Springfield Area Community Center, notwithstanding any law, local ordinance, or charter provision. The provisions of Minnesota Statutes, chapter 340A, not inconsistent with this section, apply to the license issued under this section. The city of Springfield is deemed the licensee under this section, and the provisions of Minnesota Statutes, sections 340A.603 and 340A.604, apply to the license as if the facility was a municipal liquor store. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective upon approval by the Springfield City Council and compliance with Minnesota Statutes, section 645.021. new text end